Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1401.03
Association, defined.

Association means
any two or more persons acting with a common purpose, regardless of the relative
degrees of involvement, and includes, but is not limited to, the following
persons so acting:

(1) A person and
one or more of his or her family members. For purposes of this subdivision,
family member means an individual related to the person by blood, marriage,
adoption, or legal guardianship as the person's spouse, child, parent, brother,
sister, grandchild, grandparent, ward, or legal guardian or any individual
so related to the person's spouse; and

(2) Two or more persons living in the same dwelling
unit, whether or not related to each other.

Laws 2010, LB816, § 15.